Oklahoma, session 2025, SB517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 63.3a of Title 72, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Veterans Commission is hereby authorized to


establish a private, charitable, not-for-profit foundation, to be


known as the “ODVA Foundation”. The purpose of the Foundation shall


be to encourage financial contributions for the educational,


training, and empowerment initiatives of the Oklahoma Department of


Veterans Affairs, and the support of Oklahoma’s veterans,


reservists, and their dependents. Such contributions shall be

Req. No. 541 Page 1


supplementary to any state funding received by the Oklahoma


Department of Veterans Affairs and shall provide a means to further


meet the needs of the veteran community in this state.


B. The ODVA Foundation created pursuant to this section shall


not be a public body and may receive contributions from any public


or private source to carry out the purposes of this section


including, but not limited to, gifts or grants from private


individuals, companies, foundations, corporations, and others in the


private and public sectors.


C. Upon incorporation, the ODVA Foundation shall operate


exclusively for charitable and educational purposes and shall secure


tax-exempt status under the appropriate provision of Section 501(c)


of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c).


D. The commissioners of the Oklahoma Veterans Commission shall


determine the initial members of the Foundation. The Oklahoma


Department of Veterans Affairs shall be authorized to create the


board of the ODVA Foundation. No employee of the Oklahoma


Department of Veterans Affairs shall be a voting member of the board


of the ODVA Foundation. Any voting member of the board of the ODVA


Foundation who may have a financial interest in an action under


consideration by the ODVA Foundation shall abstain from voting on


any such matter.



Req. No. 541 Page 2


E. The ODVA Foundation shall make all of its financial records


and documents including work papers, except for the names of donors


and other privileged or confidential materials, available to


auditors who are performing audits of the Oklahoma Department of


Veterans Affairs.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-541 CAD 1/19/2025 5:37:54 AM



























Req. No. 541 Page 3